Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4053.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-720.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-720.01. Career and technical education and vocational education; high schools; elective courses; definition A. Each school district and charter school that provides instruction to students in any of grades nine through twelve shall offer at least two career and technical education and vocational education courses as elective courses each school year.  If practicable, the courses offered pursuant to this section must be courses for which credits are applicable to an established community college academic degree or certificate program and are transferable to a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents. B. This section does not require a school district or charter school to offer a new course or program if the school district offers at least two career and technical education and vocational education courses on the effective date of this section. C. For the purposes of this section, "career and technical education and vocational education" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-781. END_STATUTE